Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska51-408
Nebraska Library Commission; assistance to local libraries.

The director shall when asked give advice and instruction to all libraries or individuals and to all communities which may propose to establish libraries as to the best means for establishing, organizing and administering such libraries, selecting and cataloging books, and other duties of library management. The director shall, so far as possible, promote and assist by counsel and encouragement the formation of libraries where none exist, and the director may send one of his employees or assistants to aid in organizing new libraries or improving those already established.

Laws 1935, c. 115, § 8, p. 371;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 51-508;

R.S.1943, § 51-408;

Laws 1972, LB 1033, § 12.